lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_semiFinalE.txt
!========================================
LEXICON NounInflVII
!  for noun roots that have semi-final -e
!========================================

!-----------------------------------------------|
!                 ABSOLUTIVE                    |
!-----------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
[Abs][Sg]:^                             PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl]:^%{.sf.%}et              PostInflVII; [Abs][Du]:^%{.sf.%}ek                PostInflVII;
!-----------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
[Abs][Sg][1SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ka   PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][1SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}enka   PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][1SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egka     PostInflVII;
[Abs][Sg][1PlPoss]:^put                 PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}put     PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][1PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egput    PostInflVII;
[Abs][Sg][1DuPoss]:^pung                PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}pung    PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][1DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpung   PostInflVII;
!-----------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
[Abs][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}en          PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][2SgPoss]:^ten            PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egken    PostInflVII;
[Abs][Sg][2PlPoss]:^si                  PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}si      PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][2PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egsi     PostInflVII;
[Abs][Sg][2DuPoss]:^tek                 PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}tek     PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][2DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egtek    PostInflVII;
!-----------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
[Abs][Sg][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}a           PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}i      PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][3SgPoss]:^kek              PostInflVII;
[Abs][Sg][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}at          PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}it     PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egket    PostInflVII;
[Abs][Sg][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}ak          PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}ik     PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkek    PostInflVII;
!-----------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
[Abs][Sg][4SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}ni           PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][4SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}ni      PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][4SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egni     PostInflVII;
[Abs][Sg][4PlPoss]:^teng                PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][4PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}teng    PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][4PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egteng   PostInflVII;
[Abs][Sg][4DuPoss]:^tek                 PostInflVII; [Abs][Pl][4DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}tek     PostInflVII; [Abs][Du][4DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egtek    PostInflVII;
!-----------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------------|
!            ERGATIVE (relative)            |
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
[Erg][Sg]:^%{.sf.%}em               PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl]:^%{.sf.%}et               PostInflVII; [Erg][Du]:^%{.sf.%}ek                 PostInflVII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
[Erg][Sg][1SgPoss]:^ma              PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][1SgPoss]:^ma              PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][1SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egma      PostInflVII;
[Erg][Sg][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mta      PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mta      PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][1PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemta    PostInflVII;
[Erg][Sg][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtung    PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtung    PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][1DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemtung  PostInflVII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
[Erg][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpek     PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpek     PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpek     PostInflVII;
[Erg][Sg][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesi    PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesi    PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][2PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpesi    PostInflVII;
[Erg][Sg][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetek   PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetek   PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][2DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpetek   PostInflVII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
[Erg][Sg][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}an      PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}an      PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkenka   PostInflVII;
[Erg][Sg][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}ita     PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}ita     PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkenka   PostInflVII;
[Erg][Sg][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}ita     PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}ita     PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkenka   PostInflVII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
[Erg][Sg][4SgPoss]:^mi              PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][4SgPoss]:^mi              PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][4SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmi      PostInflVII;
[Erg][Sg][4PlPoss]:^meng            PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][4PlPoss]:^meng            PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][4PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmeng    PostInflVII;
[Erg][Sg][4DuPoss]:^meng            PostInflVII; [Erg][Pl][4DuPoss]:^meng            PostInflVII; [Erg][Du][4DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmeng    PostInflVII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------------|
!                ABLATIVE MODALIS                  |
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
[Abl.Mod][Sg]:^meng                        PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl]:^neng                        PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du]:^%{.sf.%}egneng                PostInflVII;
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
[Abl.Mod][Sg][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mneng       PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mneng       PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][1SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemneng     PostInflVII;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mnneng      PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mnneng      PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][1PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemnneng    PostInflVII;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegneng    PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegneng    PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][1DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemtegneng  PostInflVII;
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
[Abl.Mod][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpeneng     PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpeneng     PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpeneng     PostInflVII;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpegneng    PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpegneng    PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpegneng    PostInflVII;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesineng   PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesineng   PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][2PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpesineng   PostInflVII;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegneng  PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegneng  PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][2DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpetegneng  PostInflVII;
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
[Abl.Mod][Sg][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}aneng      PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}aneng      PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkeneng     PostInflVII;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itneng     PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itneng     PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itneng       PostInflVII;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkeneng   PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itneng     PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itneng       PostInflVII;
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
[Abl.Mod][Sg][4SgPoss]:^mineng             PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][4SgPoss]:^mineng             PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][4SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmineng     PostInflVII;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][4PlPoss]:^meggneng           PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][4PlPoss]:^meggneng           PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][4PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmeggneng   PostInflVII;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megteneng          PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megteneng          PostInflVII; [Abl.Mod][Du][4DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmegteneng  PostInflVII;
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------|
!            LOCATIVE (localis)              |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg]:^mi                        PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl]:^ni                        PostInflVII; [Loc][Du]:^%{.sf.%}egni                PostInflVII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mni       PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mni       PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][1SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemni     PostInflVII;
[Loc][Sg][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mnni      PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mnni      PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][1PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemnni    PostInflVII;
[Loc][Sg][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegni    PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegni    PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][1DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemtegni  PostInflVII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpeni     PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpeni     PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpeni     PostInflVII;
[Loc][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpegni    PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpegni    PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpegni    PostInflVII;
[Loc][Sg][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesini   PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesini   PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][2PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpesini   PostInflVII;
[Loc][Sg][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegni  PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegni  PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][2DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpetegni  PostInflVII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}ani      PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}ani      PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkeni     PostInflVII;
[Loc][Sg][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itni     PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itni     PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itni       PostInflVII;
[Loc][Sg][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkeni   PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itni     PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itni       PostInflVII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
